Massachusetts, session 194th, H2520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 5S the following section:-
Section 5T. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Cleaning product”, a product intended for use for routine cleaning, including but not
limited to general purpose and all-purpose cleaners, glass, carpet, and bathroom cleaners,
appliance cleaners, and floor and carpet care products (cleaner, finisher, polisher, and stripper);
but shall not apply to disinfectants or sanitizers regulated by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act 7 U.S.C.
of 5

section 136 et seq. or as required by other federal or state regulations or antimicrobial hand soaps
regulated by the Food and Drug Administration.
"Department", department of public health.
“Environmentally preferable products and services”, cleaning products or services that
perform effectively and have a lesser or reduced effect on human health and the environment
when compared to competing products or services that serve the same purpose.
“Environmentally preferable purchasing criteria”, standards for evaluating products that
have been established by reputable third-party certifying organizations as specified by the
operational services division in the commonwealth’s statewide contract for environmentally
preferable cleaning products, programs, equipment, and supplies. The department shall rely on
multiple third-party certifying organizations, including, at a minimum, the United States
Environmental Protection Agency’s Design for the Environment (DfE) program, the United
States Environmental Protection Agency’s Safer Choice program, EcoLogo, and GreenSeal.
"HEPA vacuums", a high-efficiency particulate air filter vacuuming device.
“Public school”, an elementary, secondary, high, charter or innovation school operated by
a public school district or board of trustees pursuant to chapter 71.
(b) (1) The department shall recommend a public school with a pediatric asthma
prevalence of 20 per cent or higher, or the highest quartile of pediatric asthma prevalence, to
develop an indoor air quality management plan that describes the measures to be taken to
provide good and improved indoor air quality to reduce the levels of indoor air pollutants
through preventive measures to promote a comfortable and healthy learning and working
of 5

environment; plan objectives may include, but are not limited to: (i) routine maintenance
activities; (ii) periodic building evaluations and inspections; (iii) maintenance of adequate air
exchanges by repairing and maintaining ventilation equipment; and (iv) effectively
communicating corrective steps to all interested parties. Any indoor air quality management plan
shall include the use of HEPA vacuums which shall be specified in any cleaning contract entered
into by a public school for the purposes of implementing the air quality management plan.
(2) A public school under this subsection shall be recommended to create an
environmental health committee that shall consist of the school superintendent or designee,
school superintendent assistant or designee, the facilities or custodial director or designee, the
indoor integrated pest management coordinator or designee, a school nurse, a teacher, and a
parent; provided that the committee may consist of other health professionals, local government
agencies, community organizations, asthma coalitions, and others as appropriate in the
assessment of current conditions and operations and in the development of strategies to improve
indoor asthma triggers in schools and to protect the health of students, faculty, and staff. The
committee shall be trained with expertise to assess current school building conditions and
operations. The committee shall develop an indoor air quality management plan to improve
indoor asthma triggers in schools and to protect the health of students, faculty, and staff. The
committee shall sponsor activities to engage the school and community to raise awareness of the
importance of asthma and environmental triggers. The committee may secure financial assistance
through grants or other revenue sources to address environmental concerns. The department shall
develop a school indoor air quality training program to educate the committee members on how
to identify problems, develop methods to improve indoor air quality, and implement an indoor
air quality management plan. The objectives of any air quality management plan developed by
of 5

the committee may include but are not limited to (i) routine maintenance activities; (ii) periodic
building evaluations and inspections; (iii) maintenance of adequate air exchanges by repairing
and maintaining ventilation equipment; and (iv) effectively communicating corrective steps to all
interested parties. Any indoor air quality management plan developed by the committee shall
include the use of HEPA vacuums which shall be specified in any cleaning contract entered into
by a public school for the purposes of implementing the air quality management plan.
(c) (1) Beginning September 1, 2024, cleaning products shall not be used in any public
school unless the cleaning product meets environmentally preferable purchasing criteria. A
public school may purchase environmentally preferable products and services through statewide
contract vendors or through outside vendors; provided that such vendor meets environmentally
preferable purchasing criteria.
(2) A public school under this subsection shall report environmentally preferable cleaning
products and services purchased to the department, including but not limited to vendor,
manufacturer name, and product name.
(3) An individual who attends or works in a public school who experiences adverse
health effects from allergic or hypersensitivity reaction from exposure to the environmentally
preferable products and services in use pursuant to this section may request, and the facility may
utilize, other suitable materials as determined by the individual and provided by the facility. The
request shall be placed in writing and a copy shall be sent to the commissioner.
(4) The department shall recommend a public school with a pediatric asthma prevalence
of 20 per cent or higher, or the highest quartile of pediatric asthma prevalence, to purchase
of 5

environmentally preferable cleaning products and services that are approved by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency.
(d) The superintendent or designee, facilities/custodial director or designee, indoor
integrated pest management coordinator or designee, and janitorial staff shall be trained in the
use of environmentally preferable products and services prior to implementation of this section
in a public school. Vendors of environmentally preferable products and services that are not
contracted with the state but are purchased by a public school shall have trained staff and
necessary tools for such training.
of 5